Massachusetts, session 194th, S2032.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 14 of the Massachusetts General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
shall be amended by inserting at the end thereof the following new section:-
Section 15. The commissioner shall, in consultation with the Executive Office of Health
and Human Services, the Department of Transitional Assistance, and the Executive Office of
Labor and Workforce Development, establish a pilot program to test the viability and efficacy of
an universal basic income program on a population of at least 1,500 residents, randomly selected.
The commissioner shall design the program to ensure that participating residents earn a
monthly income that is at least equal to a living wage.
A participant’s monthly income shall be calculated by the Department in consultation
with the above named agencies to determine an appropriate total income for the purposes of the
of 3

program. The program shall develop mechanisms to address changes in month to month income
to provide additional accuracy to the calculation.
The program shall also calculate monthly living incomes that take into account household
size and other relevant characteristics as feasible.
The program shall compare the monthly income of the participant to the monthly living
income that applies to the participant. If the living income is greater than the monthly income,
then the department shall remit the difference to the participant.
The program shall actively solicit philanthropic funding to supplement any available state
funds in order to operate and fund the program, and before remitting income to participants, shall
certify the collection of at least 3 years worth of funding and the strong likelihood of providing
full funding for the program for at least 5 years of operation.
The commissioner shall convene an advisory committee comprised of relevant experts
from higher education institutions and from the administration. This committee shall advise the
program on the calculation of the living income and on the creation and ongoing management of
a research program to measure the wellbeing of program participants and the impact of the
program on the Commonwealth of Massachusetts.
Outcome measurements shall include but shall not be limited to:
(A). Cost of the program, including any potential savings or additional costs for other
public agencies working concurrently with program participants, including but not limited to
agencies within the executive office of health and human services.
of 3

(B). Public health outcomes, including cancer survival rates; nutrition and child
malnourishment rates; proportion of low birthweight births; hospitalization rates including
mental health admissions; rates of substance misuse; and rates of fetal alcohol syndrome.
(C). Workforce participation and educational outcomes, including measurements of hours
worked, education attainment, school attendance rates and test scores, and material prosperity.
(D). Criminal justice outcomes, including crime rates and use of the court system.
of 3